Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-2156
Utilities district; public offstreet motor vehicle parking facilities; bonds; powers.

A metropolitan utilities district shall have authority to issue bonds and evidences of indebtedness for the purposes of acquiring, purchasing, constructing, and equipping such parking facilities as provided in section 14-2142 for other public utilities under its control and may manage the funds of such parking facilities and borrow money as provided by section 14-2141 for other utilities.

Laws 1973, LB 577, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1991), § 14-1117;

Laws 1992, LB 746, § 56.